Hawaii, session 2025, HB1164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Part VII of Act 164, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as amended by Act 230, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is further amended by adding a new section 15.4 to read as follows: "SECTION 15.4.  HIGHWAY REVENUE BONDS.  The department of transportation may issue highway revenue bonds for highway capital improvement projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond funds with the debt service cost to be paid from special funds, in a principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts appropriated for the capital improvement projects and, if so determined by the department and approved by the governor, any additional principal amount as may be deemed necessary by the department to pay interest on the highway revenue bonds during the estimated period of construction of the capital improvement projects for which the highway revenue bonds are issued, to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for the highway revenue bonds or highway revenue bonds heretofore authorized (whether authorized and issued or authorized and still unissued), and to pay all or any part of the expenses related to the issuance of the highway revenue bonds.  The highway revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as amended.  The principal of and interest on the highway revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of the highway revenue bonds, shall be payable from and secured by the revenues derived from highways and related facilities under the ownership of the State or operated and managed by the department; from the highway fuel taxes, vehicle weight taxes, and vehicle registration fees levied and paid pursuant to sections 243-4, 248-8, 249-31, and 249-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes; from federal moneys received by the State or any department thereof that are available to pay principal of or interest on indebtedness of the State, or the part of any thereof as the department may determine; and from other user taxes, fees, or charges currently or hereafter derived from or arising through the ownership, operation, and management of highways and related facilities and the furnishing and supplying of the services thereof.  The expenses related to the issuance of the highway revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of the bonds, shall be paid from the state highway fund. The governor, in the governor's discretion, may use the state highway fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act where the method of financing is designated to be by highway revenue bond funds." SECTION 2. If any portion of this Act or its application to any person, entity, or circumstance is held to be invalid for any reason, then the legislature declares that the remainder of the Act and each and every other provision thereof shall not be affected thereby. If any portion of a specific appropriation is held to be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall be expended to fulfill the objective of such appropriation to the extent possible. SECTION 3. If manifest clerical, typographical, or other mechanical errors are found in this Act, the governor may correct such errors. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST